Utah statutes.
13-14-309.   Change in distribution plan.

If there is a change in the plan of distribution of a line make that contemplates a continuation of that line make in the state, a manufacturer or distributor may not directly or indirectly, through the action of any parent of the manufacturer or distributor, subsidiary of the manufacturer or distributor, or common entity cause a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a dealer franchise agreement by a present or previous manufacturer or distributor unless, by the effective date of the action the manufacturer or distributor offers the new motor vehicle dealer whose dealer franchise agreement is terminated, cancelled, or not renewed, a dealer franchise agreement that is substantially similar to the dealer franchise agreement that existed with the previous manufacturer or distributor allowing the dealer to represent the line make under the new plan of distribution.

